Alaska, session 34, HB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.25.110 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 05 (46) the executive director of the Council on Human and Sex 06 Trafficking employed under AS 44.41.155. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 39.50.200(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 08 (65) Council on Human and Sex Trafficking (AS 44.41.150). 09 * Sec. 3. AS 44.41 is amended by adding new sections to read: 10 Article 3. Council on Human and Sex Trafficking. 11 Sec. 44.41.150. Council on Human and Sex Trafficking. The Council on 12 Human and Sex Trafficking is created in the Department of Public Safety. The 13 purpose of the council is to provide planning and coordination of programs specific to 14 victim services, education, public awareness, data collection and dissemination, and 01 reducing demand for human and sex trafficking. 02 Sec. 44.41.155. Duties. (a) The council shall 03 (1) elect one of its members as chair; 04 (2) develop and implement a standardized data collection system on 05 human and sex trafficking, including methods for synthesizing and disseminating data 06 and establishing standardized definitions as necessary; 07 (3) receive and dispense state and federal money and award grants and 08 contracts from appropriations to qualified local community entities for the purpose of 09 human and sex trafficking intervention and prevention programs; 10 (4) oversee and audit qualified local community entities that receive 11 money from the council; 12 (5) coordinate and consult with the Department of Education and Early 13 Development, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Health, the 14 Department of Law, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the 15 Department of Family and Community Services, the Department of Public Safety, 16 other state agencies and qualified local community entities dealing with human and 17 sex trafficking, including the Council on Domestic Violence and Sexual Assault, and 18 survivors of human and sex trafficking to develop educational materials and resources 19 related to, and increase public awareness of, human and sex trafficking; 20 (6) provide technical assistance as requested by the state agencies and 21 qualified local community entities listed in (5) of this subsection; 22 (7) conduct public hearings and create opportunities for public input on 23 issues relating to human and sex trafficking in the state; 24 (8) make an annual report to the governor on the activities of the 25 council, plans of the council for new services and programs, and concerns of the 26 council, including recommendations for legislation necessary to carry out the purposes 27 of AS 44.41.150 - 44.41.175; the council shall notify the legislature that the report is 28 available; 29 (9) recruit and hire an executive director to oversee the council; the 30 executive director may hire staff; the executive director is in the exempt service under 31 AS 39.25.110 and staff members are in the classified service under AS 39.25.100. 01 (b) The council may create advisory subcommittees. 02 Sec. 44.41.160. Membership. (a) The council consists of the following 17 03 members: 04 (1) nine members appointed by the governor as follows: 05 (A) two members who are mayors or elected officials in local 06 government; 07 (B) one member who represents a victim advocacy 08 organization; 09 (C) one member who represents an Alaska Native organization; 10 in this subparagraph, "Alaska Native organization" has the meaning given in 11 AS 18.66.020(d); 12 (D) one member who represents a local law enforcement 13 agency; 14 (E) one member who represents a faith-based community 15 organization; 16 (F) one member who represents an organization that provides 17 direct services to the homeless; 18 (G) one member who is a leader of a labor or trade 19 organization; and 20 (H) one public member; 21 (2) the chief executive officer of the Alaska Mental Health Trust 22 Authority or the chief executive officer's designee; 23 (3) the commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee; 24 (4) the attorney general or the attorney general's designee; 25 (5) the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee; 26 (6) the commissioner of corrections or the commissioner's designee; 27 (7) the commissioner of education and early development or the 28 commissioner's designee; 29 (8) the commissioner of labor and workforce development or the 30 commissioner's designee; and 31 (9) the commissioner of family and community services or the 01 commissioner's designee. 02 (b) Public members of the council appointed under (a)(1) of this section serve 03 three-year terms. A public member serves at the pleasure of the governor and may not 04 serve more than two consecutive terms. The governor shall fill a vacancy of a public 05 member on the board by appointment for the unexpired portion of the vacated term. 06 (c) A person who receives compensation from or is an employee of the state or 07 a human or sex trafficking crisis intervention or prevention program may not be 08 appointed as a public member of the council. 09 Sec. 44.41.165. Meetings and quorum. (a) The council shall meet at least 10 quarterly by teleconference or other electronic means at times to be determined by the 11 chair. Additional meetings by teleconference or other electronic means may be called 12 by the chair. Advisory subcommittees shall meet by teleconference or other electronic 13 means. The council may hold an annual in-person meeting. 14 (b) The council may convene public meetings in person to present information 15 and receive public comment. 16 (c) Nine members of the council or a majority of filled positions, whichever is 17 fewer, constitute a quorum for conducting business. 18 Sec. 44.41.170. Compensation and expenses. The members of the council 19 receive no salary but are entitled to transportation expenses and per diem in 20 accordance with AS 39.20.180. 21 Sec. 44.41.175. Definitions. In AS 44.41.150 - 44.41.175, 22 (1) "council" means the Council on Human and Sex Trafficking; 23 (2) "human and sex trafficking" means conduct in violation of 24 AS 11.41.360, 11.41.365, or AS 11.66.110 - 11.66.130. 25 * Sec. 4. AS 44.66.010(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 26 (17) Council on Human and Sex Trafficking (AS 44.41.150) - June 30, 27 2029. 28 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.